Hawaii statutes.
[§245-34] Approval of department required
for transfer of stamps. Unaffixed stamps shall not be sold, exchanged, or
in any manner transferred by a licensee to another person without prior written
approval of the department. Any person who violates this section shall be
subject to a fine of not less than $500 and not more than $1,000 for each
violation. [L 2000, c 249, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next